Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 27.2
Single-Use Plastic Straws

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 203, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

21-27.2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Food service establishment” shall have the meaning set forth in §

21-27-1

.

“Single-use plastic straw” means a single-use, disposable tube made predominantly of plastic derived from either petroleum or a biologically based polymer, such as corn or other plant sources, used to transfer a beverage from a container to the mouth of the person drinking the beverage. “Single-use plastic straw” does not include a straw made from non-plastic materials, including, but not limited to, paper, pasta, sugar cane, wood, or bamboo.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 203, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

21-27.2-2.
Prohibited practices exception.

A food service establishment shall not provide a single-use plastic straw to a consumer unless requested by the consumer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 203, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

21-27.2-3.
Penalties.

The first and second violations of this chapter shall result in a notice of violation, and any subsequent violation shall be punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each violation by the service establishment, but not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 203, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

21-27.2-4.
Enforcement.

The director of health shall promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 203, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.